lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Medžioklė ir šaudymas > Dažasvydis: Dažasvydžio bunkeriai ir kliūtys; Dažasvydžio granatų paleidimo įrenginiai; Dažasvydžio granatos; Dažasvydžio ginklų dalys ir priedai; Dažasvydžio ginklai; Dažasvydžio diržai ir komplektai; Dažasvydžio minos ir spąstai; Dažasvydžio apsauginės priemonės; Dažasvydžio dažų rutuliukai
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Лов и стрелба > Пейнтбол: Бункери и препятствия за пейнтбол; Гранатомети за пейнтбол; Гранати за пейнтбол; Части и аксесоари за пистолети за пейнтбол; Оръжия за пейнтбол; Колани за пейнтбол; Мини и капани за пейнтбол; Защитна екипировка за пейнтбол; Топчета за пейнтбол
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Vânătoare și tir > Paintball: Buncăre și obstacole pentru paintball; Lansatoare de grenade pentru paintball; Grenade pentru paintball; Piese și accesorii pentru arme de paintball; Arme de paintball; Hamuri și rucsacuri de paintball; Mine și capcane pentru paintball; Echipament de protecție pentru paintball; Mingi de paintball
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Vadászat és lövészet > Paintball: Paintball bunkerek és fedezékek; Paintball gránátvetők; Paintball gránátok; Paintball fegyveralkatrészek és -kiegészítők; Paintball fegyverek; Paintball hevederek és csomagok; Paintball aknák és csapdák; Paintball-védőfelszerelés; Paintballok
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Caccia e tiro a segno > Paintball: Bunker e ostacoli da paintball; Lanciagranate per paintball; Granate per paintball; Parti e accessori per armi da paintball; Armi da paintball; Imbracature e pacchetti per paintball; Mine e trappole da paintball; Equipaggiamento protettivo per paintball; Palline da paintball
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Avcılık ve Atıcılık > Paintball: Paintball siperleri ve engelleri; Paintball Bomba Atarları; Paintball El Bombaları; Paintball Silahı Parçaları ve Aksesuarları; Pantball Tüfekleri; Paintball Yelek ve Şarjörlükleri; Paintball mayınları ve bubi tuzakları; Paintball Koruyucu Ekipman; Paintball Kapsülleri
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Săn bắn > Bắn súng sơn: Chướng ngại vật & boong-ke bắn sơn; Máy bắn đạn sơn; Lựu đạn súng sơn; Phụ kiện súng sơn; Súng sơn; Bao và gói đựng đạn sơn; Mìn & bẫy bắn sơn; Thiết bị bảo vệ bắn súng sơn; Đạn sơn
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Jakt och skytte > Paintball: Bunkrar och hinder för paintball; Granatkastare för paintball; Paintballgranater; Delar till paintballmarkörer; Paintballmarkörer; Paintballpoddar och packs; Minor och fällor för paintball; Skyddsutrustning för paintball; Paintballkulor
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Metsästys ja ammunta > Paintball: Paintball-suojat ja esteet; Paintball-kranaatinheittimet; Paintball-kranaatit; Paintball-aseiden osat ja tarvikkeet; Paintball-aseet; Paintball-valjaat ja -taskut; Paintball-miinat ja ansat; Paintball-suojavarusteet; Värikuulat
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Hunting & Shooting > Paintball: Paintball Bunkers & Obstacles; Paintball Grenade Launchers; Paintball Grenades; Paintball Gun Parts & Accessories; Paintball Guns; Paintball Harnesses & Packs; Paintball Mines & Booby Traps; Paintball Protective Gear; Paintballs
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Jagt og skydning > Paintball: Paintballbunkere og -forhindringer; Granatkastere til paintball; Paintballgranater; Våbendele til paintball; Paintballpistoler; Paintballrustninger og -pakker; Paintballminer og booby traps; Beskyttelsesudstyr til paintball; Paintballkugler
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Caça e tiro > Paintball: Bunkers e obstáculos para paintball; Lançadores de granadas para paintball; Granadas de paintball; Peças de armas de paintball; Armas de paintball; Arneses para paintball; Minas e armadilhas para paintball; Equipamento de proteção para paintball; Balas de tinta de paintball
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Jagen und Schießen > Paintball: Paintball-Bunker & -Hindernisse; Paintball-Granatwerfer; Paintball-Granaten; Ersatzteile & Zubehör für Paintball-Gewehre; Paintball-Markierer; Paintball-Battlepacks; Paintball-Minen & -Fallen; Paintball-Schutzbekleidung; Paintballs
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Lov in streljanje > Paintball: Bunkerji in ovire za paintball; Naprave za izstreljevanje paintball kroglic; Paintball kroglice; Deli in dodatki za paintball markerje; Pištole za paintball; Pasovi in nahrbtniki za paintball; Mine in pasti za paintball; Zaščitna oprema za paintball; Paintball kroglice
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lov a střelba > Paintball: Paintballové bunkry a překážky; Granátomety na paintball; Granáty na paintball; Díly a příslušenství ke zbraním na paintball; Pistole na paintball; Postroje a vybavení na paintball; Paintballové miny a nástražná zařízení; Paintballové chrániče; Kuličky na paintball
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Caça e tiro > Paintball: Bunkers e obstáculos de paintball; Lança-granadas para paintball; Granadas para paintball; Acessórios e peças para réplicas de paintball; Réplicas para paintball; Conjuntos e arneses para paintball; Minas e armadilhas de paintball; Equipamento de proteção para paintball; Bolas de paintball
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Jagen en schieten > Paintball: Paintballbunkers en -obstakels; Lanceerders voor paintballgranaten; Paintballgranaten; Onderdelen en accessoires voor paintballgeweren; Paintballgeweren; Paintballharnassen en -pakketten; Paintballmijnen en -boobytraps; Beschermende uitrusting voor Paintball; Paintballkogels
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 打獵和射擊 > 漆彈: 漆彈掩體與障礙物; 漆彈榴彈發射器; 漆彈手榴彈; 漆彈槍零件/配件; 漆彈槍; 漆彈袋/漆彈包; 漆彈地雷與詭雷; 漆彈護具; 漆彈子彈
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > 狩猟・射撃 > ペイントボール用品: ペイントボール用バンカー＆障害物; ペイントボール用手榴弾発射筒; ペイントボール用手榴弾; ペイントボールガン関連用品; ペイントボールガン; ペイントボール用ハーネス・パック; ペイントボール用マイン＆ブービートラップ; ペイントボール用プロテクター; ペイントボール
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Jakt og skyting > Paintball: Paintballbunkere og -hinder; Granatkastere for paintball; Paintballgranater; Deler og tilbehør for paintballpistoler; Paintballpistoler; Paintballseler og -pakker; Paintballminer og snublefeller; Beskyttelsesutstyr til paintball; Paintballs
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Κυνήγι & σκοποβολή > Paintball (χρωματοσφαίριση): Προστατευτικά και εμπόδια Paintball; Εκτοξευτές χειροβομβίδων Paintball; Χειροβομβίδες Paintball; Εξαρτήματα & αξεσουάρ όπλων Paintball; Όπλα Paintball; Ζώνες & σακίδια Paintball; Νάρκες και παγίδες Paintball; Προστατευτικός εξοπλισμός Paintball; Μπάλες Paintball
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Lov i streljaštvo > Paintball: Bunkeri i prepreke za paintball; Paintball bacači granata; Paintball granate; Dijelovi i dodaci za paintball puške; Puške za paintball; Paintball pojasevi sa spremnicima; Mine i zamke za paintball; Zaštitna oprema za paintball; Paintball kuglice
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 사냥/사격 > 페인트볼: 페인트볼 벙커 및 장애물; 페인트볼 탄환 발사기; 페인트볼 수류탄; 페인트볼 건 부품/부대용품; 페인트볼 건; 페인트볼 하네스/팩; 페인트볼 지뢰 및 부비 트랩; 페인트볼 보호 장비; 페인트탄
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Myślistwo i strzelectwo > Paintball: Przeszkody i balony paintballowe; Granatniki do paintballu; Granaty paintballowe; Akcesoria do markerów paintballowych; Markery paintballowe; Pasy na faty paintballowe; Miny i pułapki paintballowe; Sprzęt ochronny do paintballa; Kulki paintballowe
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 打猎与射击 > 彩弹: 彩弹掩体与障碍物; 漆弹榴弹发射器; 漆弹手榴弹; 漆弹枪零件/配件; 漆弹枪; 漆弹弹药袋/包; 彩弹地雷与绊雷; 彩弹射击防护装备; 漆弹球
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Chasse et tir > Paintball: Obstacles et bunkers de paintball; Lance-grenades de paintball; Grenades de paintball; Pièces et accessoires de lanceurs de paintball; Lanceurs de paintball; Kits et porte-munitions de paintball; Mines et pièges de paintball; Équipement de protection pour paintball; Billes de peinture
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Охота и стрельба > Пейнтбол: Пейнтбольные укрытия и фигуры; Пейнтбольные гранатометы; Пейнтбольные гранаты; Детали и аксессуары для пейнтбольных маркеров; Пейнтбольные маркеры; Разгрузки и харнесы; Пейнтбольные мины и ловушки; Защитная экипировка для пейнтбола; Пейнтбольные шарики
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > การล่าสัตว์และยิงปืน > เกมเพนท์บอล: บังเกอร์และสิ่งกีดขวางเพนต์บอล; เครื่องยิงลูกระเบิดของเพนท์บอล; ลูกระเบิดเพนท์บอล; ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์ปืนเพนท์บอล; ปืนเพนท์บอล; เข็มขัดใส่กระสุนสำหรับเพนท์บอล; กับระเบิดและกับดักเพนต์บอล; อุปกรณ์ป้องกันสำหรับเพนท์บอล; เพนท์บอล
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Caza y tiro > Paintball: Búnkeres y obstáculos de paintball; Lanzagranadas para paintball; Granadas de paintball; Piezas y accesorios de pistolas de paintball; Pistolas de paintball; Arneses y portapods para paintball; Minas y trampas explosivas de paintball; Equipo de protección para paintball; Bolas de pintura
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Poľovníctvo a streľba > Paintball: Paintballové bunkre a prekážky; Paintballové granátomety; Paintballové granáty; Diely a príslušenstvo pre paintballové zbrane; Paintballové zbrane; Paintballové postroje a balíčky; Paintballové míny a nástražné pasce; Ochranné vybavenie na paintball; Paintballové guličky